Tennessee, session 114, SB1513.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-247(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (18).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-250(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Department of children's services, created by §§ 4-3-101 and 37-5-101;
SECTION 3. The department of children's services shall report back to the education,
health, and general welfare joint evaluation committee by December 31, 2026, to update the
committee on its progress in addressing the findings and observations set forth in the December
2025 performance audit report issued by the division of state audit.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1513
010070
- 1 -